District of Columbia statutes.
31-1631.09

Adjustments to comply with insurance contract and law.

A public insurance adjuster shall adjust or investigate every claim, damage, or loss made or occurring under an insurance contract for which the public insurance adjuster has been employed in accordance with the terms and conditions of his or her contract with the insured and the applicable laws and regulations of the District.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-256, § 9, 50 DCR 238

History